Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.303

Modular home.

"Modular home" means a factory-assembled structure designed primarily for use as a dwelling when connected to the required utilities that include plumbing, heating, and electrical systems contained therein, does not contain its own running gear, and must be mounted on a permanent foundation. A modular home does not include a mobile home or manufactured home.

[ 1990 c 250 s 17; 1971 ex.s. c 231 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 231: See note following RCW 46.01.130.